Tables/Contraction/de-2015.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2025 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://brltty.app/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# BRLTTY Contraction Table - German (contracted - 2015 standard)
# Created by Mario Lang <mlang@tugraz.at>.

include de-g1.ctb

class a a
class aeu aeu
class b b
class f f
class h h
class i i
class m m
class n n
class r r
class hilmnrsu hilmnrsu
class l l
class lnr lnr
class cegn cegn
class st st
class konsonant bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxyz

include de-wort.cti
before e always auslöse 16-234-123-246-234-15
before e always ausreise 16-234-1235-146-234-15
before hilmnrsu always ausnahme 16-234-1345-134-15
prfword ausnahmen 16-234-1345-134-14
before hilmnrsu always aussage 16-234-234-1245-15
prfword aussagen 16-234-234-1245-14
before konsonant always aussagen 16-234-234-1245-14
prfword aussagend 16-234-234-1245-14-145
prfword aussagende 16-234-234-1245-14-145-15
prfword aussagendem 16-234-234-1245-14-145-12356
prfword aussagenden 16-234-234-1245-14-145-14
prfword aussagender 16-234-234-1245-14-145-12456
prfword aussagendes 16-234-234-1245-14-145-123456
always aussagenklass 16-234-234-1245-14-13-123-1-2346
before g always aussagenklän 16-234-234-1245-14-13-123-345-1345


before s always aus 16-234

before t sufword aus 16-234
always austerität 16-23456-12456-5-345
always austern 16-23456-12456-1345

# Ausnahmen für Vokalgruppen aus de-g1.ctb
before e always arteri 356-2345-12456-24
always barrier 12-356-1235-24-12456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction

prfword atelier 1-2345-13456-24-12456
prfword ateliers 1-2345-13456-24-12456-234
always bankier 12-235-13-24-12456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
prfword collier 6-14-135-12345-24-12456
prfword colliers 6-14-135-12345-24-12456-234
prfword croupier 6-14-1235-135-136-1234-24-12456
prfword croupiers 6-14-1235-135-136-1234-24-12456-234
prfword finanzier 124-35-235-1356-24-12456
prfword finanziers 124-35-235-1356-24-12456-234
prfword kollier 13-135-12345-24-12456
prfword kolliers 13-135-12345-24-12456-234
midendword iell 24-15-12345 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always indien 35-145-24-14 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always indienststell 35-145-346-1345-23456-2-13456
always magazindienst 134-1-1245-1-1356-35-145-346-1345-23456
always termindienst 2345-12456-134-35-145-346-1345-23456
always karrier 13-356-1235-24-12456
always medien 134-15-145-24-14 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always prämie 1234-1235-345-134-24-15
always prämien 1234-1235-345-134-24-14
always prämier 1234-1235-345-134-346-1235
always propriet 12345-1234-1235-24-15-2345 proprietär shouldn't use the ie-contraction
endword serie 234-12456-24-15
always spezies 234-1234-15-1356-24-123456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction

# Due to their low usage frequency in typical german text the letters
# c, q, x and y are reused for the en-, ll-, ex/mm/nis- and el-contractions.
# Therefore they need a proceding letsign to disambiguate them.
always c 6-14
always C 6-14
always q 6-12345
always Q 6-12345
always x 6-1346
always X 6-1346
always y 6-13456
always Y 6-13456

# Lautgruppenkürzungen
midendword ach 56
begmidword al 25
begmidword : 6-25
begmidword an 235
begmidword ar 356
begmidword be 23
midendword beule 12-126-123-15
midendword beulen 12-126-123-14
before g always beu 12-126
always bell 23-12345 tabelle should use the ll-contraction
midendword ck 46
midword eh 2356
always kohle =
always kohlen 13-135-125-123-14
always kohleintopf 13-135-125-123-1246-2345-135-1234-124
always kohleintöpf 13-135-125-123-1246-2345-246-1234-124
before g always kohleinla 13-135-125-123-1246-123-1
before e always kohleul 13-135-125-123-126-123 ⠨⠅⠕⠓⠇⠣⠇⠉

always ein 1246
always einnen 15-35-1345-14 ⠨⠯⠓⠌⠎⠑⠔⠝⠉⠎⠩⠦ ⠨⠯⠓⠌⠎⠑⠔⠝⠉⠞⠷⠏⠻⠁⠞⠥⠗ ⠨⠧⠊⠵⠑⠔⠝⠉⠍⠔⠊⠾⠻
always lateinisch 123-1-2345-1246-24-156 shouldn't use the ein-contraction
always eillustration 15-24-12345-136-23456-1235-5-1345
always eillustrier 15-24-12345-136-23456-1235-346-1235
before i always eindustr 15-35-145-136-23456-1235
always einformation 15-35-124-26-134-5-1345
always einitiativ 15-35-24-2345-24-5-1236
before t always einstitu 15-35-23456-24-2345-136
before t always einstrumen 15-35-23456-1235-136-134-14

always teindex 236-35-145-15-6-1346
always teindustr 236-35-145-136-23456-1235
before i always teinfanter 236-35-124-235-2345-12456
always teinformation 236-35-124-26-134-6-1345
always steinformation 23456-1246-124-26-134-6-1345
before t always teinstitu 236-35-23456-24-2345-136
always teinitiativ 236-35-24-2345-24-5-1236
before t always teinterna 236-35-2345-12456-1345-1
before t midword teinstrumen 236-35-23456-1235-136-134-14
always eintoleranz 15-35-2345-135-123-12456-235-1356
always nukleinsäur 1345-136-13-123-15-35-234-34-1235
always dateinam 145-1-2345-146-1345-1-134

always el 13456
begmidword elineal 15-123-35-15-25
endword elineal 15-123-35-15-1-123
always eleist 15-123-146-23456

always em 12356
always emach 15-134-56
before e always emachs 12356-56-234 Systemachse
always emagazin 15-134-1-1245-1-1356-35
always emanagement 15-134-235-1-12346-134-14-2345
always emedizin 15-134-15-145-24-1356-35
always emodell 15-134-135-145-15-12345

always en 14
always denunz 145-15-1345-256-1356 shouldn't use the en-contraction
always er 12456
always eregister 15-1235-15-1245-24-23456-12456
always eregistr 15-1235-15-1245-24-23456-1235
always derealis 145-15-1235-15-25-24-234
always dereferenzier 145-15-1235-15-124-12456-14-1356-346-1235 shouldn't use the er-contraction
always deregul 145-15-1235-15-1245-136-123 shouldn't use the er-contraction

always es 123456
always esammlung 15-234-1-1346-123-136

always ge 12346
sufword gerst 1245-12456-23456
prfword gehe 1245-2356-15
prfword gehen 1245-2356-14
prfword gehend 1245-2356-14-145
prfword gehende 1245-2356-14-145-15
prfword gehendem 1245-2356-14-145-12356
prfword gehenden 1245-2356-14-145-14
prfword gehender 1245-2356-14-145-12456
prfword gehendes 1245-2356-14-145-123456
prfword gehens 1245-2356-14-234
before konsonant always geh 1245-2356
always gehung 1245-2356-136 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
before t always gehunger 12346-125-256-1245-12456
always angehen 235-1245-2356-14
always angehst 235-1245-2356-23456
always angeht 235-1245-2356-2345
always aufgehen 2-16-1245-2356-14
always aufgehst 2-16-1245-2356-23456
always aufgeht 2-16-1245-2356-2345
always einandergehe 2-1246-1245-2356-15
always einandergehen 2-1246-1245-2356-14
always einandergehst 2-1246-1245-2356-23456
always einandergeht 2-1246-1245-2356-2345
always einandergehefte 2-1246-12346-125-15-124-236
always einandergehetz 2-1246-12346-125-15-2345-1356
always eingehen 1246-1245-2356-14
always fremdgeher 124-1235-12356-145-1245-2356-12456
always kinogeher 13-35-135-1245-2356-12456
always rutengeher 1235-136-2345-14-1245-2356-12456
always tiefgehen 2345-346-124-1245-2356-14
always tourengeher 2345-135-136-1235-14-1245-2356-12456
always umgehen 136-134-1245-2356-14
always umgehst 136-134-1245-2356-23456
always umgeht 136-134-1245-2356-2345
always vorgehen 2-26-1245-2356-14
always vorgehst 2-26-1245-2356-23456
always vorgeht 2-26-1245-2356-2345
always weitgehen 2456-2345-1245-2356-14

always geinbau 1245-1246-12-16
always geinblick 1245-1246-12-123-24-46
always geinfahr 1245-1246-2-1235
always geinheit 1245-1246-125
always geinnahm 1245-1246-1345-134
always geinricht 1245-1246-2-3456
always geinsatz 1245-1246-234-1356
always geinsätz 1245-1246-5-234-1356
always geinsamkeit 1245-1246-2346-13
always geinschlag 1245-1246-156-1245
always geinschläg 1245-1246-5-156-1245
before t always geinschnit 1245-1246-156-1345-24-2345
always geinstell 1245-1246-2-13456
always geinstuf 1245-1246-23456-136-124
always geintrag 1245-1246-2345-1245
always geinträg 1245-1246-5-2345-1245
always geinwirk 1245-1246-2456-13
always gelektro 1245-13456-15-13-2345-1235-135

always geißel 1245-146-6-2346-13456




before konsonant always bel 12-13456 Übelkeit shouldn't use the be-contraction
word bel 12-13456
before konsonant always bem 12-12356
before konsonant always ben 12-14
before konsonant always ber 12-12456
always säuber 234-34-12-12456
always schrauber 156-1235-16-12-12456
always zauber 1356-16-12-12456

before konsonant always gel 1245-13456 klingelton shouldn't use the ge-contraction
prfword gelei 1245-13456-146
prfword geleien 1245-13456-146-14
always evangel 15-1236-235-1245-13456
always kegel 13-15-1245-13456
always kugel 13-136-1245-13456
always segel 234-15-1245-13456

before konsonant always gen 1245-14
always genetik 1245-14-15-2345-24-13
always genetisch 1245-14-15-2345-24-156
always halogen 125-25-135-1245-14
begword lungen 123-256-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
begword magen 134-1-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction

before konsonant always ten 2345-14
midendword tenergie 2345-14-12456-1245-346
endword tenergien 2345-14-12456-1245-24-14
always angestellten 235-12346-2-13456-2345-14
always architekten 356-1456-24-236-13-2345-14
sufword arten 356-2345-14
always astronauten 1-23456-1235-135-1345-16-2345-14
always blüten 12-123-1256-2345-14
always breiten 12-1235-146-2345-14
always dienstboten 145-346-1345-23456-12-135-2345-14
begmidword dirigenten 145-24-1235-45-14-2345-14
always dokumenten 145-135-13-136-134-14-2345-14
begmidword dozenten 145-135-1356-14-2345-14
always elefant 13456-15-124-235-2345
always geburten 12346-12-136-1235-2345-14
always geflüchteten 12346-124-123-1256-1456-236-2345-14
begmidword geschichten 12346-156-3456-2345-14
always hintenüber 125-35-2345-14-2-1256
always insekten 35-234-15-13-2345-14
always instrumenten 35-23456-1235-136-134-14-2345-14
begmidword interessenten 2-35-14-2345-14
always kanten 13-235-2345-14
begmidword klienten 13-123-24-14-2345-14
always kometen 13-135-134-15-2345-14
always komponenten 13-135-134-1234-135-1345-14-2345-14
always konsumenten 13-135-1345-234-136-134-14-2345-14
always konten 13-135-1345-2345-14
begmidword koordinaten 13-135-26-145-35-1-2345-14
begmidword mandanten 134-235-145-235-2345-14
always medikamenten 134-15-145-24-13-1-134-14-2345-14
always piloten 1234-24-123-135-2345-14
always piraten 1234-24-1235-1-2345-14
always piraterie 1234-24-1235-1-2345-12456-346
always planeten 1234-123-235-15-2345-14
begmidword präsidenten 1234-1235-345-234-24-145-14-2345-14
always quanten 6-12345-136-235-2345-14
begmidword quoten 6-12345-136-135-2345-14
begmidword regelrenten 1235-15-1245-13456-1235-14-2345-14
always satelliten 234-1-236-12345-24-2345-14
begmidword saiten 234-1-24-2345-14
begword seiten 234-146-2345-14
always breitseiten 12-1235-146-2345-234-146-2345-14
always musterseiten 134-136-23456-12456-234-146-2345-14
begmidword rückseiten 1235-46-234-146-2345-14
always unterseiten 2-256-234-146-2345-14
begmidword spalten 234-1234-25-2345-14
